Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-121.04
Program review; required.

The Nebraska College of Technical Agriculture at Curtis or any educational program of such college shall be subject to program review pursuant to the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education Act.

Laws 1988, LB 1042, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 64.

Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education Act, see section 85-1401.